en: extra fine sweat peas
fr: petits pois doux extra fins, petits pois doux extra-fins, petits pois doux très fins
it: piselli dolci finissimi
sv: extra fina söta ärtor

en: large garden peas
fr: garden peas, garden peas petits, garden peas medium, garden peas gros, gros pois, grois pois à saveur sucrée

fr: farine de petits pois
en: garden peas flour

en: snow pea, mangetout, snow peas
ca: tirabec
da: sukkerært
de: Kefen, Zuckerschoten, Zuckererbse
el: γλυκομπίζελα, ζαχαρομπίζελο
es: guisante mollar
fr: pois mange-tout
gl: tirabeque
hr: snježni grašak
id: kapri
it: taccole
ja: 絹さや, kinusaya
ko: 백설콩
nl: peultje, peultjes
su: kapri
tr: sultani bezelye

en: sugar snap peas
de: Knackerbse
eo: sukerpizo
es: guisante azucarado
fi: sokeriherne
fr: pois gourmand, pois croquant, pois sucré
ja: スナップエンドウ
ko: 슈가스냅완두, 스냅완두
la: Pisum sativum var. saccharatum
lt: cukriniai žirniai
lv: cukurzirņi
sk: hrach siaty cukrový
sv: sockerärt

en: whole dried peas, whole peas, safed vatana, matar
nl: heelerwten, gedroogde erwten

en: split pea, split peas
de: Schälerbsen, geschälte Trockenerbsen
el: Φάβα
fa: لپه
fi: halkaistu herne, halkaistut herneet
fr: pois cassé, pois cassés
hr: cijepani grašak
hu: Felesborsó
it: piselli spezzati
ko: 완두 짜개
ms: Kacang dal
nl: spliterwt, Spliterwten
pl: groch łuskany, grochu łuskanego, groszek łuskany
ru: лущеный горох
te: split peas

en: cooked split peas
fr: pois cassés cuits
it: piselli spezzati cotti

en: green split pea
de: grüne Schälerbsen, grüne Trockenerbsen
fi: vihreä halkaistu herne
fr: pois cassés verts
hr: zeleni grašak
it: piselli verdi spezzati
nl: groene spliterwten

en: yellow split pea
fr: pois cassé jaune, pois cassés jaunes
hu: sárgaborsó

en: grey pea, grey peas
fr: pois gris
hr: sivi grašak
hu: szürke borsó, szürkeborsó
it: pisello grigio
la: pisum sativum subsp. arvense
sv: gråärta, gråärtor, gråärt, gråärtan

en: grass pea, grasspea, grass peas, cicerchia, blue sweet pea, chickling pea
de: Saat-Platterbse
es: almorta, Chícharo, chicharo
fi: peltonätkelmä
fr: pois carré, pois carrés, gesse
hr: trava grašak
hu: szegletes lednek, szeges lednek
it: cicerchia
la: lathyrus sativus
pt: chícharo
sv: plattvial

en: grass pea from Alvaiázere, grass peas from Alvaiázere
es: Chícharo de Alvaiázere, Chícharos de Alvaiázere
fr: pois carrés d'Alvaiázere
it: cicerchia di Alvaiázere

en: lentils, lentil, Masoor dal, Masur dal
am: ምስ'ር
ar: عدس
av: ТIипало
az: Mərcimək
bg: леща
bn: মসুর ডাল
bo: སྲན་ལེབ་ཆུང་ངུ།
ca: llentilla
cs: čočka jedlá, čočka
cv: Ясмăк
cy: Corbysen corbys
da: Linser
de: Linse, Linsen
el: Φακή
eo: Lento
es: lenteja
et: Lääts, läätsed
eu: Dilista
fa: عدس
fi: linssi, linssit
fr: lentilles, lentille
ga: Lintile
gl: Lentella
gu: મસુર
he: עדשה תרבותית
hi: मसूर
hr: leća
hu: főzeléklencse, lencse
is: Linsubaun
it: Lenticchie, lenticchia
ja: レンズマメ
kk: Азықтық жасымық
kn: ಮಸೂರ ಅವರೆ
ko: 렌즈콩
ku: Nîsk
la: Lens culinaris
lt: Valgomasis lęšis
lv: lēcas
mk: Леќа
mn: Сэвэгзарам
mr: मसूर
ms: Lentil
nb: Linse
ne: मुसुरो
nl: linzen, linze
nn: Linser
oc: Lentilha cultivada
or: ମସୁର
pl: soczewica, soczewicy, soczewicowa, soczewicowe, soczewicowy
pt: Lentilha
qu: Lantrihas
ro: Linte
ru: чечевица пищевая
sd: مھري دال
sh: Leća
si: මසූර්
sk: Šošovica jedlá
sl: Navadna leča
so: Misir
sq: Thjerrëza
sr: сочиво
sv: Linser, Lins
sw: Mdengu
ta: மைசூர்ப் பருப்பு
tg: Наск
tr: Mercimek
tt: Ясмык
uk: сочевиця
vi: Đậu lăng
wa: Lintile
yi: לינזן
zh: 小扁豆

en: Dried lentils
de: Getrocknete Linsen
es: Lentejas secas
fr: Lentilles sèches
hr: sušena leća
it: Lenticchie secche
pt: Lentilhas secas

fr: lentilles réhydratées, lentilles sèches trempées
fi: kuivattu linssi, kuivatut linssit

en: precooked lentils
de: vorgekochte Linsen
fi: esikypsennetty linssi, esikypsennetyt linssit
fr: lentilles précuites
hr: prethodno kuhana leća
it: lenticchie precotte
nl: voorgekookte linzen
pl: soczewica gotowana

de: gelbe Linsen, Linsen gelb
fr: lentilles blondes
hr: leća žuta

en: green lentils
bg: зелена леща
cs: zelená čočka
de: grüne Linsen, Linsen grün
es: lentejas verdes
fi: vihreä linssi, vihreät linssit
fr: lentille verte, lentilles vertes
hr: leća zelena
hu: zöld lencse
it: lenticchie verdi
nl: groene linzen
pl: soczewica zielona, soczewicy zielonej
pt: lentilhas verde
sv: gröna linser

en: organic green lentils
bg: био зелена леща
de: Bio Linsen grün
fi: vihreä luomulinssi, vihreät luomulinssit
fr: lentilles vertes bio
hr: organska zelena leća
it: lenticchie verdi bio